Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 12. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 06.26.900.
Powers of department.

The department may

exercise general supervision over trust companies, interstate trust companies, and international trust companies, and the subsidiaries and affiliated corporations of trust companies, interstate state trust companies, and international trust companies;

in addition to other authority in this chapter to adopt regulations, adopt regulations necessary to interpret and implement this chapter, including regulations providing for the retention and preservation of records;

review and approve or disapprove applications for trust companies under AS

06.26.090

, trust company branch offices under AS

06.26.160

, representative offices under AS

06.26.170

, and trust offices and representative offices under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

;

issue permits authorizing trust company holding companies to do business in this state;

determine for each trust company the amount of paid-in capital necessary to operate under AS

06.26.120

;

review and approve transfers of trust company ownership under AS

06.26.450

;

perform examinations of trust companies, branch offices, representative offices, subsidiaries of trust companies, private trust companies, and subsidiaries of private trust companies under AS

06.01.015

and this chapter;

relieve a trust company from the examination requirements of AS

06.01.015

if the trust company’s deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, a successor of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or another agency of the United States that insures trust company deposits;

approve under AS

06.26.190

the operation of a branch trust company on a schedule different than normal banking days;

approve the operation by a trust company of an automated teller machine in accordance with AS 06.05;

approve certain trust company subsidiaries;

approve the acceptance by a trust company of the trust company’s stock or of the stock of the trust company’s holding company as security for a loan under circumstances approved by the department;

restrict the withdrawal of deposits from a trust company if the department finds that extraordinary circumstances make restriction necessary for the proper protection of depositors;

require a trust company to

maintain its capital and reserve accounts in amounts determined appropriate by the department;

observe the methods and standards that the trust company adopts for determining the value of various types of assets;

charge off part or all of an asset that has not been lawfully acquired;

write down an asset to its market value;

record liens and other interests in property;

obtain a financial statement from a borrower or prospective borrower to the extent that the trust company can obtain the statement;

obtain insurance against damage to real property taken as security;

search or obtain insurance on the title to real property taken as security;

maintain adequate insurance against risks as the department determines necessary and appropriate for the protection of depositors and the public;

charge off that portion of an asset classified as a loss, or charge off or reserve up to 50 percent of loans classified as doubtful, in a state or federal report of examination; or

charge off all debts owed to the trust company in which interest is past due and unpaid for a period of six months, unless the debt principal is adequately secured and the trust company is in the process of collection;

require the board of directors of a trust company to hold a meeting under AS

06.26.520

;

order the removal of a board member of a trust company under AS

06.26.510

;

order a trust company to suspend the payment of dividends under AS

06.26.120

and regulations adopted by the department;

require a trust company to increase its capital accounts under AS

06.26.120

;

take possession of a trust company in the manner provided in AS

06.26.730

—

06.26.750

, and operate, reorganize, or liquidate the trust company after taking possession;

issue an order under AS

06.01.030

that the department determines is necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter; and

exercise other powers expressly or implicitly granted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For powers of the department, see 3 AAC 1, art. 1.

For name, powers, organization, and capitalization, see 3 AAC 4, art. 2.

For investments, loans, deposits, and trust assets, see 3 AAC 4, art. 3.

For ownership, see 3 AAC 4, art. 4.

For governance, see 3 AAC 4, art. 5.

For organic change, see 3 AAC 4, art. 6.

For interstate state trust company and international trust company offices, see 3 AAC 4, art. 7.

Sec. 06.26.905.
Cooperative agreements.

The department may enter into cooperative, coordinating, or information-sharing agreements with other governmental regulators or with an organization affiliated with or representing governmental regulators to handle the periodic examination or other supervision of a trust office that is located in this state and owned by an interstate state trust company or of a trust office that is located in a host state and owned by a trust company. Under the agreements, the department may accept reports of examination and reports of investigation instead of conducting the department’s own examinations or investigations.

The department may enter into joint enforcement action agreements with other governmental regulators having concurrent jurisdiction over a trust company that is located in this state and owned by an interstate state trust company organized in another state or over a trust office that is located in a host state and owned by a trust company.

Notwithstanding the existence of an agreement under this section, the department may at any time make an examination or take independent supervisory or enforcement action if the department determines that the examination or action is necessary or appropriate to carry out the department’s responsibilities under this chapter or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.910.
Appeals.

A person may appeal to the department

a denial of an application under AS

06.26.090(e)

;

an order under AS

06.26.120

to increase or adjust capital;

a denial under AS

06.26.150

of a change of the location of a home office under AS

06.26.150

;

a denial under AS

06.26.160

of permission for a trust company to establish a branch office;

a denial under AS

06.26.170

of permission to establish or acquire a representative office;

a denial under AS

06.26.180(d)

of permission to establish an office outside this state;

a denial of a private trust company exemption under AS

06.26.200

and

06.26.210

;

the conditions or limitations established for an exemption under AS

06.26.200(e)

;

the revocation of an exemption under AS

06.26.230

;

a denial of permission for a private trust company to convert to a trust company under AS

06.26.240

;

a denial under AS

06.26.470

of an application to acquire control of a trust company;

the disapproval under AS

06.26.650

of a conversion, merger, or consolidation;

a denial under AS

06.26.840(d)

of permission to establish or acquire a trust office in this state;

a denial under AS

06.26.850(g)

of permission to establish or acquire a representative office in this state; and

a denial under AS

06.26.860

of permission for additional trust offices or representative offices.

The department shall adopt regulations, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, establishing the procedures for appeals allowed under (a) of this section.

The provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), including judicial review under AS

44.62.560

, apply to an appeal under this chapter to the extent the provisions of AS 44.62 do not conflict with the procedures established under (b) of this section or other provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.920.
Civil enforcement.

The department may bring any appropriate civil court action against a person who the department determines has committed or is about to commit a violation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.930.
Trust company reports to the department; publication of reports.

A trust company shall make at least four reports of its condition each year to the department as required by and on forms prescribed by the department. Each report shall be signed by a duly authorized officer of the trust company verified by at least one independent director, and each verifying director shall certify under oath that the director has personal knowledge of the facts stated in the report and that the facts are true. Each report must exhibit in detail and under appropriate headings the resources and liabilities of the trust company and must be received by the department within 30 calendar days after the end of the period covered by the report.

The department may require that a trust company submit special reports whenever the department considers a report necessary in order to obtain full knowledge of the trust company’s condition.

In addition to the other reports required by this section, a trust company shall make at least one report of income and dividends to the department each year. The trust company shall submit the report to the department within 30 calendar days after the end of the calendar or fiscal year covered by the report.

All of the reports of condition required by this section shall be made available to all customers on request and at no charge to the customer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.940.
Remedy of person damaged by violation.

In addition to any other remedies available under law to the person, a person who suffers damages as a result of a violation of this chapter by a person subject to this chapter may bring an action in court against the person violating this chapter to recover the damages. In this section, “person subject to this chapter” means a trust company, a private trust company, an exempt private trust company, a person who is required to obtain a certificate of authority under AS

06.26.090

, and an interstate state trust company or international trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.950.
Limitation on powers.

This chapter does not allow a trust company to engage in banking.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)